Vermont statutes. Title 14A Trusts
Chapter 12. Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 1201.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this title, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

§ 1202.
Electronic records and signatures.

The provisions of this title governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures conform to the requirements of Section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7002) and supersede, modify, and limit the requirements of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section, which is being inserted in all Uniform Acts approved in 2000 or later, preempts the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act. Section 102(a)(2)(B) of that Act provides that the federal law can be preempted by a later statute of the State that specifically refers to the federal law. The effect of this section, when enacted as part of this Code, is to leave to state law the procedures for obtaining and validating an electronic signature. The Uniform Trust Code does not require that any document be in paper form, allowing all documents under this Code to be transmitted in electronic form. A properly directed electronic message is a valid method of notice under the Code as long as it is reasonably suitable under the circumstances and likely to result in receipt of the notice or document.
See
Section 109(a).

§ 1203.
Severability clause.

If any provision of this title or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this title which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this title are severable.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

§ 1204.
Application to existing relationships.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, on the effective date of this title:

this title applies to all trusts created before, on, or after its effective date;

this title applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after its effective date;

this title applies to judicial proceedings concerning testamentary trusts commenced before its effective date except that accountings shall continue to be due from the trustees of such trusts in the same manner and in the same frequency as required by the Probate Division of the Superior Court prior to this title unless otherwise ordered by the Probate Division of the Superior Court;

this title applies to all other judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before its effective date unless the Probate Division of the Superior Court finds that application of a particular provision of this title would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of this title does not apply and the superseded law applies;

any rule of construction or presumption provided in this title applies to trust instruments executed before the effective date of this title unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

an act done before the effective date of this title is not affected by this title.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before the effective date of this title, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. February 1, 2011.